Wisconsin, session 2025, SB686.
do enact as follows:SB686,13Section 1. 1.10 (3) (w) of the statutes is created to read:SB686,1,441.10 (3) (w) The Wisconsin natural pearl is the state gem.SB686,25Section 2. 1.10 (4) of the statutes is amended to read:SB686,2,261.10 (4) The Wisconsin Blue Book shall include the information contained in 7this section concerning the state song, ballad, waltz, dance, beverage, tree, grain, 1flower, bird, fish, animal, domestic animal, wildlife animal, dog, insect, fossil, 2mineral, rock, soil, fruit, tartan, pastry, dairy product, and herb, and gem.SB686,2,33